District of Columbia statutes.
38-1202.03

Suspension, removal, and termination of Trustees.

(a)

Any Trustee shall be automatically suspended from serving as such member after he has been found guilty of a felony by a court of competent jurisdiction. Upon a final determination of his guilt or innocence, the term of such member shall automatically terminate or be reinstated.

(b)

The Board of Trustees shall have the power to remove any member, after fair notice and an opportunity to be heard, at any time for adequate cause which relates to such members’ character or efficiency as a Trustee.

(c)

The tenure of the student member shall automatically terminate if the status of such member ceases to be that of a full-time student at the University.

History

Oct. 26, 1974, 88 Stat. 1425, Pub. L. 93-471, title II, § 203
Nov. 1, 1975, D.C. Law 1-36, § 4, 22 DCR 2921

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1513.
1973 Ed., § 31-1713.